Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2908
Act, how construed; failure to comply, effect on taxes levied.

The Nebraska Municipal Auditing Law shall not be construed to relieve any officer of any duties now required by law of him or her with relation to public accounts of a municipality or the disbursement of public funds of a municipality. Failure of the municipality to comply with any provisions of the Nebraska Municipal Auditing Law shall not affect the legality of taxes levied for any of the funds of such municipality or any special assessments levied in connection with public improvements.

Laws 1959, c. 69, § 8, p. 298;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 176.